Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3298
Recreation area; abandoned vehicle; penalty.

Any person who abandons any motor vehicle, trailer, or other conveyance in a recreation area shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1984, LB 861, § 10.